Illinois, session 104th, HB3269.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Housing Equity, Affordability, and Development Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. 7    "Tenant payments to the landlord" means the 3-month 8average of monthly costs paid by the tenant to the landlord or 9agents including transaction fees, required utility fees, 10required maintenance fees, and pet fees; and one-twelfth of 11any move-in fees, credit check fees, application fees, or 12other one-time fees that are applied to every tenant. 13    Section 10. Housing Equity, Affordability, and Development 14Fund fee. The Department of Revenue shall collect a fee from 15landlords with more than 5 units equal to 5% of the difference 16between their monthly rental income for a unit and $1,200, 17unless the rental income for the unit is less than $1,200, to 18be paid into the Housing Equity, Affordability, and 19Development Fund. The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to 20implement this Act. 21    Section 15. Housing Independence Program. The Illinois   HB3269- 2 -LRB104 11069 JRC 21151 b1Housing Development Authority shall create a program under 2this Act to assist in home purchases for households whose 3tenant payments to the landlord have been more than 30% of 4their income for a period of 12 calendar months, and whose 5income is less than 3.33 times the median rent for their 6metropolitan area; or if the household does not live in a 7metropolitan area, 3.33 times the median rent in the closest 8metropolitan area. Assistance is limited to $15,000 per 9household. The Illinois Housing Development Authority may 10adopt rules to implement this Act. 11    Section 20. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 12Section 5.1030 as follows: 13    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)14    Sec. 5.1030. The Housing Equity, Affordability, and 15Development Fund.